Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 73. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT HOUSTON

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 73.001. COMPOSITION. The University of Texas at Houston is composed of the following component institutions under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System:

(1) The University of Texas Medical School at Houston;

(2) The University of Texas Dental Branch at Houston;

(3) The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center;

(4) The University of Texas Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences at Houston;

(5) The University of Texas School of Public Health at Houston;

(6) The University of Texas School of Nursing at Houston; and

(7) other institutions and activities assigned to it from time to time.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3170, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MEDICAL SCHOOL AT HOUSTON

Sec. 73.051. SHORT TITLE. This subchapter may be cited as the Brooks-Bass Medical Training Act of 1969.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3170, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.052. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. The board of regents shall establish and maintain The University of Texas Medical School at Houston, a component institution of the university system located in Harris County. The board may provide for the training and teaching of medical students, medical technicians, and other technicians in the practice of medicine.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3170, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.053. TRANSFER OF DIVISION OF CONTINUING EDUCATION. The board may transfer the division of continuing education from The University of Texas Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences at Houston to The University of Texas Medical School at Houston. After the transfer, all appropriations, assets, funds, property, and equipment owned or held by the division of continuing education shall be owned, held, and controlled by The University of Texas Medical School at Houston.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3171, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.054. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. The board may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees offered in other leading American medical schools, may award the degrees, and may make other rules and regulations for the operation, control, and management of the school, including the determination of the number of students that shall be admitted to any degree-granting program, that are necessary for the conduct of a professional school of the first class.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3171, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.055. AFFILIATION AGREEMENTS; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. The board may execute and carry out with any entity or institution affiliation or coordinating agreements that are reasonably necessary or desirable for the conduct and operation of a professional school of the first class; and the board may make joint appointments in other institutions under its governance. The salary of any person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3171, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.056. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer, on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, grants or gifts of property, including real estate and money, that may be tendered to it in aid of the planning, establishment, conduct, and operation of the school and in aid of research and teaching at the school. The board may accept from the federal government or any foundation, trust fund, corporation, or individual donations, gifts, and grants, including real estate, buildings, libraries, laboratories, apparatus, equipment, records, or money, for the use and benefit of the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3171, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.057. TEACHING HOSPITAL. A complete teaching hospital for the school shall be furnished at no cost or expense to the state, and the state shall never contribute any funds for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a teaching hospital for the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3171, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS M. D. ANDERSON CANCER CENTER

Sec. 73.101. LOCATION. The University of Texas M. D. Anderson Cancer Center is located in the Texas Medical Center in the city of Houston.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 644, Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 1989.

Sec. 73.102. PURPOSE; DEGREE PROGRAMS. (a) The institution and its substations shall be devoted to the diagnosis, teaching, study, prevention, and treatment of neoplastic and allied diseases.

(b) If the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board determines that the role and mission of the institution should be changed to include degree-granting authority, the board of regents may:

(1) prescribe courses and conduct allied health professional degree programs related to the purposes of the institution described by Subsection (a); and

(2) jointly prescribe courses and jointly conduct graduate programs at the master's and doctoral levels related to those purposes with:

(A) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences; and

(B) The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston, with respect to graduate programs separately established at the health science center and related to the broad fields encompassed in population and public health.

(c) The degree programs to be offered under Subsection (b) are subject to approval by the coordinating board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 112, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 86, Sec. 1, eff. May 11, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 166 (S.B. 1251), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2021.

Sec. 73.103. PRESIDENT. (a) The board of regents shall appoint a president of the institution.

(b) To be qualified for appointment as president, a person must be a licensed physician possessing an M.D. degree with at least five years of experience practicing medicine.

(c) The president has charge of the operation and conduct of the institution and has any other powers and duties conferred on him by the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.104. MEDICAL STAFF. The medical staff of the institution shall be selected and employed by the board on the recommendation of the president, and may be discharged in like manner.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.105. DIAGNOSTIC AND TREATMENT SUBSTATIONS. The board may establish and maintain diagnostic and treatment substations as deemed expedient from time to time. The location, erection, operation, and management of the substations are under the control and direction of the board, subject to the other provisions of this subchapter. The substations and the main institution shall conform to the standards of the American College of Surgeons and the American Medical Association.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.106. PATIENTS. This subchapter governs the admission of patients to the institution and its substations, the support of patients, and other matters relating to patients.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 73.107. ADMISSION: RULES AND REGULATIONS; APPROVAL OF PRESIDENT. (a) Admission to the institution and its substations is subject to rules and regulations promulgated from time to time by the president.

(b) No person shall be admitted until the president is satisfied that all requirements of this subchapter and the rules and regulations of the president have been met.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3172, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.108. APPLICATION. (a) Admission is subject to the written application of the patient, the guardian of the patient, or some friend or relative of the patient.

(b) The written application shall be on forms prescribed by the president and shall include:

(1) the patient's name, age, sex, and national origin;

(2) the patient's residence address or addresses for at least the two-year period preceding the date of the application;

(3) the patient's occupation, trade, profession, or employment;

(4) the names and addresses of the patient's parents, children, brothers, sisters, and other responsible relatives, if any;

(5) the names, addresses, and ages of any relatives who are or who may have been similarly afflicted;

(6) a complete statement of the location, description, and value of any real or personal property owned, possessed, or held by the patient or his guardian;

(7) the name of each person legally liable for the support of the patient and a statement of the location, description, and value of any real or personal property owned, possessed, or held by that person; and

(8) any other information or statements that may be required by the president.

(c) The application may be accompanied by a written request for the patient's admission by his attending physician which includes:

(1) a statement that he has adequately examined the patient and that the patient has, or is suspected of having, a neoplasm or allied disease;

(2) a statement indicating the duration of the disease, if known, and indicating any accompanying bodily disorder or disorders the patient may have at the time of the application; and

(3) any other information that may be required by the president.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3173, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 2, eff. March 20, 1995.

Sec. 73.109. FEE SCHEDULE. The president shall establish a schedule of minimum fees and charges conforming to the fees and charges customarily made for similar services in the community in which the services are rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3173, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.110. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept gifts and grants of money from other than state sources for the benefit of the institution and its substations.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3173, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.111. ACCEPTANCE OF LAND IN MEDICAL CENTER. The board may accept for and in behalf of the State of Texas title by proper conveyance or conveyances to any land located in the Texas Medical Center for the operation and maintenance of the program of the institution.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3173, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.112. TREATMENT OF INDIGENT PATIENTS. (a) The institution may enter into a contract with a county, public hospital, or hospital district to provide treatment to residents of the county or service area who are eligible for health care assistance under Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code (Indigent Health Care and Treatment Act).

(b) The liability of a county, public hospital, or hospital district to the institution for the treatment of residents of the county or service area by the institution shall not exceed the responsibility of a county as provided for in Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code, unless agreed to by the county, public hospital, or hospital district in a contract entered into pursuant to this section.

(c) If a contract is entered into pursuant to this section, the liability of a county, public hospital, or hospital district under the contract shall take into consideration the actual costs of the institution in providing health care services pursuant to the contract, but in no event shall the liability exceed such costs.

(d) If a contract is not entered into pursuant to this section, the institution shall receive the approval of a county, public hospital, or hospital district before providing nonemergency health care services to an eligible resident of the county or service area. If such approval is not received, the county, public hospital, or hospital district is not liable to the institution for any nonemergency care provided to such persons. If such approval is received, the county, public hospital, or hospital district is liable to the institution as provided in Subsection (b) for the services provided by the institution to such persons.

(e) As used in this section, "eligible resident," "hospital district," "public hospital," and "service area" have the meanings assigned by Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 73.113. SUFFICIENCY OF INSTITUTIONAL FUNDS, FEES, AND PATIENT BASE. The institution shall ensure that institutional funds and the institution's hospital and clinic fees and patient base are sufficient to fund and achieve the mission and strategic plan of the institution and protect the state's investment in the development of the institution.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 3, eff. March 20, 1995.

Sec. 73.114. INCENTIVE RETIREMENT PLANS. (a) The institution may offer incentive retirement plans to employees of the institution who elect to retire under other state law.

(b) An incentive offered to an employee by the institution must be paid from institutional funds or hospital or clinic fees.

(c) An institutional plan providing for incentive retirement plans must be filed with the Legislative Budget Board not later than the 61st day before the date the plan is implemented.

(d) The institution may not rehire an employee receiving a retirement incentive under this section without the specific approval of the president.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 3, eff. March 20, 1995.

Sec. 73.115. ACQUISITION OF GOODS AND SERVICES. (a) The institution may acquire goods or services by the method that provides the best value to the institution, including:

(1) competitive bidding;

(2) competitive sealed proposals;

(3) catalogue purchase;

(4) a group purchasing program; or

(5) an open market contract.

(b) In determining what is the best value to the institution, the institution shall consider:

(1) the purchase price;

(2) the reputation of the vendor and of the vendor's goods or services;

(3) the quality of the vendor's goods or services;

(4) the extent to which the goods or services meet the institution's needs;

(5) the vendor's past relationship with the institution;

(6) the impact on the ability of the institution to comply with laws and rules relating to historically underutilized businesses;

(7) the total long-term cost to the institution of acquiring the vendor's goods or services; and

(8) any other relevant factor that a private business entity would consider in selecting a vendor.

(c) The state auditor may audit purchases of goods or services by the institution.

(d) The institution may adopt rules and procedures for the acquisition of goods or services.

(e) To the extent of any conflict, this section prevails over any other law relating to the purchasing of goods and services other than Section 51.9337 and a law relating to contracting with historically underutilized businesses.

(f) Except as otherwise provided by this section and Section 51.9337, Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, and Chapter 2254, Government Code, do not apply to purchases of goods and services made under this section.

(g) In any contract for the acquisition of goods or services to which the institution is a party, a provision required by applicable law to be included in the contract is considered to be a part of the executed contract without regard to:

(1) whether the provision appears on the face of the contract; or

(2) whether the contract includes any provision to the contrary.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 3, Sec. 3, eff. March 20, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 17.19(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1346 (S.B. 1195), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1366 (S.B. 1604), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (S.B. 20), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 5.008, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS GRADUATE SCHOOL OF BIOMEDICAL SCIENCES AT HOUSTON

Sec. 73.151. DEAN. (a) The University of Texas Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences at Houston is under the direction of a dean appointed by the board of regents.

(b) To be qualified for appointment as dean, a person must have a doctor of medicine degree or a doctor of philosophy degree in one of the biomedical sciences.

(c) The dean is responsible through the chancellor or other executive officer of the system to the board.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3174, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.152. SCOPE; DEGREE PROGRAMS; RULES AND REGULATIONS. (a) The board of regents may prescribe courses and conduct graduate and postdoctoral programs at the master's and doctoral levels in the sciences and other academic areas directly related to medical education and research, but the board shall not operate this institution as a general academic graduate school. The degree programs to be offered by the graduate school are subject to approval by the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

(b) The board of regents may make rules and regulations necessary for the operation, control, and management of the graduate school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3174, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.153. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept and administer grants and gifts from any source for the benefit of the graduate school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3174, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.154. RESEARCH AND GRADUATE INSTRUCTION; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board may expend funds appropriated by the legislature to the graduate school and grant, gift, and contract funds of the school in support of research and graduate instruction, within approved areas and programs, to be carried out either in its own facilities or in the facilities of other component units of The University of Texas at Houston.

(b) The board may make joint appointments in the graduate school and in one or more of the other component units of The University of Texas System. The salary of a person who is receiving a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the different units on the basis of services rendered.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3174, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.155. AFFILIATION AND COOPERATION WITH OTHER UNITS. The graduate school shall maintain the closest possible affiliation with the science programs at The University of Texas at Austin and with the other medical units of The University of Texas System. It shall cooperate with other institutions, private and public, in furtherance of research in the biomedical sciences and related fields.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3174, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.156. DIVISION OF CONTINUING EDUCATION. The board may establish as a part of the graduate school a separate division of continuing education for physicians.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER E. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SCHOOL OF PUBLIC HEALTH AT HOUSTON

Sec. 73.201. LOCATION. The University of Texas School of Public Health at Houston is located in the Texas Medical Center in the city of Houston.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.202. GIFTS AND DONATIONS. The board of regents may accept gifts and donations for the benefit of the school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER F. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS DENTAL BRANCH AT HOUSTON

Sec. 73.301. COMPOSITION, LOCATION. The University of Texas Dental Branch at Houston is composed of The University of Texas Dental School at Houston, The University of Texas Dental Science Institute at Houston, The University of Texas School of Dental Hygiene at Houston, The University of Texas Postgraduate School of Dentistry at Houston, and other institutions and activities assigned to it from time to time. It is located in the Texas Medical Center.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.302. PURPOSE. The principal purpose of the dental school is to teach the subjects of dental education that will give a thorough knowledge of dentistry and related subjects and that meet the requirements of the Council on Dental Education, the American Association of Dental Schools, and other educational associations of similar standards concerned with dental education.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.303. FACULTY. The board of regents shall appoint the faculty of the dental school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.304. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES AND REGULATIONS. (a) The board may confer degrees and issue diplomas, and may fix a standard of grades for students.

(b) The dental school shall have regular courses leading to degrees and special courses deemed necessary by the board.

(c) The board may make other rules and regulations it deems necessary for the proper control and management of the dental school.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3175, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 73.305. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may accept gifts and grants from any source for the benefit of the dental branch.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3176, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

SUBCHAPTER G. HARRIS COUNTY PSYCHIATRIC CENTER

Sec. 73.401. ESTABLISHMENT. The Harris County Psychiatric Center has been developed and built by Harris County, Texas, and a former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities. The facilities of the Harris County Psychiatric Center to be operated by The University of Texas System shall be operated consistent with the rules and regulations of the board of regents and with the provisions of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.402. MISSION. The Harris County Psychiatric Center has been established with the mission of caring for mentally ill persons; other major parts of this mission include research into the causes and cures of mental illness and the education of professionals in the care of the mentally ill.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 73.403. OPERATION OF COMMITMENT CENTER. Harris County, the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD, or both of those entities, may operate on the premises of the Harris County Psychiatric Center a commitment center, the functions of which may include patient screening, intake, and admissions (both voluntary and involuntary) to the Harris County Psychiatric Center as may be provided for in a lease and operating agreement or a sublease and operating agreement as authorized under Section 73.405. The functions of the Harris County Psychiatric Commitment Center located on the premises of the Harris County Psychiatric Center both in terms of operation and in terms of funding shall not be the responsibility of the Health and Human Services Commission or The University of Texas System. As may be provided for in a lease and operating agreement or a sublease and operating agreement, The University of Texas System may charge for any support services provided by the Harris County Psychiatric Center to the commitment center.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.404. FUNDING. (a) Funding for the state-supported facilities and operations of the Harris County Psychiatric Center shall be provided through legislative appropriations to the Health and Human Services Commission and to The University of Texas System, and any appropriations to the commission for the Harris County Psychiatric Center shall be transferred to The University of Texas System in accordance with the General Appropriations Act and the lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement provided for in Section 73.405. Legislative appropriations may be for any further construction at the Harris County Psychiatric Center; for equipment, both fixed and movable; for utilities, including data processing and communications; for maintenance, repairs, renovations, and additions; for any damage or destruction; and for operations of the Harris County Psychiatric Center; provided, however, that as to funding for Harris County Psychiatric Center operations, legislative appropriations shall not exceed 85 percent of the total operating costs of the entire Harris County Psychiatric Center, exclusive of any costs of the commitment center.

(b) Any funding, under a lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement wherein The University of Texas System is the lessee, for facilities and operations of the Harris County Psychiatric Center supported by the county or the Health and Human Services Commission, which may be provided through county appropriations, including funds made available by the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD, or from gifts and grants, shall be transferred in accordance with the lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement provided for in Section 73.405. Such funds may be for any further construction at the Harris County Psychiatric Center; for equipment, both fixed and movable; for utilities, including data processing and communications; for maintenance, repairs, renovations, and additions; for any damage or destruction; and for Harris County Psychiatric Center operations which latter funding may be proportional to the total costs of The University of Texas System operating the entire Harris County Psychiatric Center, exclusive of any additional cost incurred by Harris County or the Health and Human Services Commission for operating the commitment center, which costs shall remain the sole responsibility of the entity or entities that incurred those costs.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.405. OPERATIONS. (a) The state-supported facilities of the Harris County Psychiatric Center shall be leased to and operated and administered by The University of Texas System in accordance with a lease and operating agreement. The facilities supported by the county or the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD, exclusive of the commitment center, may be leased or subleased by The University of Texas System in the same lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement. Any lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement shall provide for a lease payment by The University of Texas System of no more than $1 per year plus other good and valuable consideration as provided for in Section 73.406.

(b) In any lease and/or sublease and operating agreement, the board of regents of The University of Texas System shall be the governing board of the Harris County Psychiatric Center facilities that are leased and/or subleased and operated by The University of Texas System.

(c) Any lease and/or sublease and operating agreement may provide all necessary or desirable terms for the operation of the Harris County Psychiatric Center and may provide for duties and powers with respect to medical and legal matters, Harris County Psychiatric Center administration, staffing, patient services, reports, annual operating budgets of the Harris County Psychiatric Center, and transfers of appropriated funds as provided for in Section 73.404 of this code.

(d) Any lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement shall provide that The University of Texas System shall cause the Harris County Psychiatric Center to be operated in accordance with the standards for accreditation of The Joint Commission; that all financial transactions and performance programs may be appropriately audited; that an admission, discharge, and transfer coordination policy be established; that appropriate patient data be made available to the Health and Human Services Commission, the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD, and the county, including but not limited to diagnosis and lengths of stay; and that a priority of patient treatment policy be established.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.406. REVENUES. That portion of any revenues related to the provision of patient services through the operation of the Harris County Psychiatric Center facilities that are leased or subleased by and to The University of Texas System shall be accounted for and expended in accordance with the rules, regulations, and bylaws of The University of Texas System and in such manner that such revenues will reduce appropriated and funded requirements by both the state and county or the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD on a prorated basis, all as may be provided for in a lease and operating agreement or sublease and operating agreement.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER H. RESEARCH INSTITUTE

Sec. 73.501. TRANSFER AND LEASE OF FACILITIES. (a) The governance, operation, management, and control of the Texas Research Institute of Mental Sciences and all land, buildings, improvements thereon, and major fixed equipment comprising said institute shall be leased from the Health and Human Services Commission or a former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities and transferred to the board of regents of The University of Texas System for $1 a year and shall be subject to the provisions of Section 65.02(a)(9).

(b) All land, buildings, and improvements thereon and major fixed equipment comprising said institute leased by The University of Texas System shall be utilized only for purposes of patient care services, research, and education related to mental health, intellectual disability, and developmental disability. The Health and Human Services Commission or a former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities may sell or otherwise dispose of the land, buildings, improvements thereon, or major fixed equipment provided that the proceeds from the sale or other disposition shall be used for the same purposes in Harris County; and further provided, that the board of regents of The University of Texas System, prior to such sale or other disposition, has approved of such sale or disposition and the allocation of proceeds.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.502. TRANSFER OF GIFTS, GRANTS, UNEXPENDED BALANCES, CONTRACTS, AND OBLIGATIONS. Any gifts, grants, unexpended balances of appropriated or unappropriated funds, and all movable equipment that was held by a former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities or that was transferred to the Health and Human Services Commission on dissolution of that former agency and was held for, on behalf of, or for the use and benefit of the Texas Research Institute of Mental Sciences are hereby transferred to The University of Texas System; provided, however, that all previously appropriated funds for statewide training of personnel and program evaluation by the institute shall be retained by the Health and Human Services Commission. All contracts and written obligations of every kind and character entered into by a former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities for and on behalf of the Texas Research Institute of Mental Sciences are ratified, confirmed, and validated, and in all such contracts and written obligations, the board of regents of The University of Texas System is substituted in lieu and shall stand and act in place and stead of the former state agency that provided services to persons with mental illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, and persons with developmental disabilities; provided, however, that an advisory committee shall be established with regard to research protocols and the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall be a member; provided further, that The University of Texas System may contract with the Department of State Health Services for continued extramural and other laboratory consultative services. The Health and Human Services Commission, Harris County, and the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD shall provide for the continuity of inpatient and outpatient care of the patients and programs operated at the Texas Research Institute of Mental Sciences and may contract for the provision of such services in accordance with the provisions of and appropriations provided in the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.503. EMPLOYEES. (a) Present institute personnel shall be allowed to apply for employment with The University of Texas System, Harris County, or the Harris Center for Mental Health and IDD and be given priority consideration for such employment.

(b) If employed by The University of Texas System, when the Texas Research Institute of Mental Sciences is transferred to The University of Texas System, employees of the institute who become employees of The University of Texas System shall become members of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas, if they are otherwise eligible under the law and rules governing membership, and all their service and salary credit shall be transferred from the Employees Retirement System to the Teacher Retirement System, subject to Subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

(c) Service of those employees that was covered by the Employees Retirement System before the transfer shall thereafter be regarded as service that was covered by the Teacher Retirement System. The law and rules of the Teacher Retirement System pertaining to membership, service and salary credit, member contributions, and reinstatement of withdrawn accounts shall apply to service occurring before the transfer, except that the member contribution rate for such service shall be that in effect for members of the Employees Retirement System. Member contributions previously withdrawn from the Employees Retirement System may be reinstated in the Teacher Retirement System only subject to the laws and rules governing reinstatement of accounts and credit in the Teacher Retirement System.

(d) Military service credit already established with the Employees Retirement System will be credited by the Teacher Retirement System only when the employee's service credit, excluding military credit, in the Teacher Retirement System consists of at least 10 years. Deposits for military credit transferred under Subsection (e) of this section will be placed in the member savings account of the employee and refunded if the employee dies or retires on a disability benefit before obtaining 10 years of credit. An employee may obtain a total of no more than five years of military service credit in the Teacher Retirement System, including military credit transferred pursuant to this section, and may not receive duplicate credit for the same military duty.

(e) When credit is transferred pursuant to this section or as soon thereafter as possible, the Employees Retirement System shall transfer to the Teacher Retirement System the following:

(1) all amounts in the individual member accounts with the Employees Retirement System of employees described in Subsection (b) of this section and any member contributions subsequently received for these employees for service before the date of transfer; and

(2) an amount from the state accumulation fund determined by the actuary of the Employees Retirement System to be such that the transfer of funds and service credit under this section will neither increase nor diminish the period required to amortize the unfunded liability of that system.

(f) An employee described in Subsection (b) of this section shall not be entitled to a refund of contributions or retirement from the Employees Retirement System in lieu of the transfer of credit provided by this Act. After the transfer of the institute to The University of Texas System, the employee shall not be entitled to credit in the Employees Retirement System for service subject to transfer to the Teacher Retirement System under this section.

(g) The legislature may appropriate to the Teacher Retirement System an amount determined necessary to finance the additional actuarial liabilities created by this section and not financed by the transfer of funds provided by Subsection (e) of this section.

(h) The Employees Retirement System, the Health and Human Services Commission, and The University of Texas System shall provide the Teacher Retirement System with information necessary to establish employees' rights to credit under this section. The Employees Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System shall establish procedures to prevent duplication of retirement credit for the same service.

(i) If employed by The University of Texas System, such employees shall be subject to the personnel policies, rules, and regulations of the board of regents of The University of Texas System, after the transfer provided for in this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 965), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 73.504. NAME OF INSTITUTE. Hereafter, the name of the institute shall be The University of Texas Mental Sciences Institute.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 848, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.